Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-1159 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purposes of this section, the term “cultivated meat”
means a meat or meat product that was produced from cultured animal
tissue produced from in vitro animal cell cultures outside of the
animal from which the cells were derived.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2121 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. 1. It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture,
sell, hold or offer for sale, or distribute any cultivated meat
product in this state.
2. Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor.
C. 1. A seller of food under Sections 1-1118, 1-1118.1, and 1-
1119 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes that sells or distributes
cultivated meat products in violation of subsection B of this
section shall be subject to all enforcement measures as provided by
rule of the State Department of Health.
2. The license of a seller of food may be suspended or revoked,
as provided by rule of the State Department of Health, upon the
conviction of an owner or an employee of the licensed seller of food
for a violation of subsection B of this section.
D. The State Department of Health may adopt rules as necessary
to implement this section.
E. Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing any
federal, state, or local governmental entity or institution of
higher education, or a person that is partnered with a governmental
entity or institution of higher education as evidenced by a formal
agreement, from conducting research in this state regarding the
production of cultivated meat products.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 88, O.S.L. 2025
(63 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1-1160), is amended to read as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2121 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 1-1160. A. As used in this act section:
1. “Agricultural food animal” means any domesticated animal
belonging to the bovine, caprine, ovine, or porcine species, or any
domesticated chicken or turkey;
2. “Cultivated-protein food product” means a food product
having one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue
originating from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of
being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing
cells or nonanimal sources, including processes in which one or more
stem cells are initially isolated from an agricultural food animal,
are grown in vitro, and may be manipulated, as part of a
manufacturing operation;
3. “Identifying meat term” means any word or phrase that
states, indicates, suggests, or describes a meat product and
includes any:
a. common name for the species of the agricultural food
animal subject to slaughter and processing, including
calf, chicken, cow, goat, hog, kid, lamb, pig,
poultry, sheep, or turkey,
b. any characteristic of a species of the agricultural
food animal subject to slaughter and processing,
including beef, broiler, cabrito, chevon, fryer, lamb,
mutton, pork, poulet, veal, or yearling, and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2121 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. common name used to describe a major cut of a meat of
an agricultural food animal slaughtered and processed,
including a major meat cut or any other common name
that a reasonable purchaser would immediately and
exclusively associate with a meat product prepared for
sale in normal commercial channels, including bacon,
bologna, bone, brat, bratwurst, brisket, burger, butt,
chop, chuck, cold cut, cutlet, filet, flat iron,
frank, frankfurter, ham, hamburger, hock, hot dog,
jerky, liverwurst, loin, London broil, lunch meat, New
York strip, pepperoni, porterhouse, rib, ribeye,
roast, salami, sausage, shank, sirloin, sparerib,
tenderloin, or any comparable word or phrase;
4. 3. “Insect-protein food product” means a food product having
one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue
originating from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of
being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing
insect parts;
5. 4. “Manufactured-protein food product” means a cultivated
protein food product, an insect-protein food product, or plant-
protein food product containing more than a trace amount of plant-
protein food products;
6. 5. “Plant-protein food product” means a food product having
one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue found
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2121 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

in a species of agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being
derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing plant
parts; and
7. 6. “Qualifying term” means a word, compound word, or phrase
that would clearly disclose to a reasonable purchaser of meat
products that a food product is not a meat product including cell-
cultivated, cell-cultured, fake, grown in a lab, imitation, insect,
insect-based, insect protein, lab-created, lab-grown, meat-free,
meatless, plant, plant-based, vegan, vegetable, vegetarian, veggie,
or any comparable word or phrase.
B. No person shall falsely advertise or misbrand any food or
distribute, offer for sale, or sell any misbranded food.
C. A food shall be deemed to be falsely advertised or
misbranded if:
1. For any manufactured-protein food product that is labeled
with an identifying meat term, such manufactured-protein food
product is not labeled with a conspicuous and prominent qualifying
term in close proximity to the identifying meat term; or
2. For any manufactured-protein food product that is labeled
with an identifying meat term and offered for sale at a food
establishment, such manufactured-protein food product is not labeled
in a manner that is clearly and distinctly separate from any product
that is made from tissue originating from any agricultural food
animal.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2121 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. A manufactured-protein food product is falsely advertised or
misbranded if:
1. All labeling or advertising for such manufactured-protein
food product that lists an identifying meat term does not include a
conspicuous and prominent qualifying term in close proximity to the
identifying meat term; or
2. For any manufactured-protein food product that is offered
for sale at a food establishment, such manufactured-protein food
product is not stored in a manner that:
a. keeps such product separate from tissue originating
from agricultural food animals, and
b. uses distinctive shelf tags or other posted
representations to identify and distinguish such
manufactured-protein food product from tissue
originating from agricultural food animals.
E. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
shall investigate all credible complaints that food products are
falsely advertised or misbranded as meat products.
F. Any person who violates the provisions of this act section
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor.
G. A manufacturer of food under Sections 1-1118, 1-1118.1, and
1-1119 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title that violates
this act section shall be subject to all enforcement measures as

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2121 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prov ided by rule of the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,
and Forestry.
H. The Department State Board of Agriculture, Food, and
Forestry may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
February 9, 2026 - DO PASS


















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2121 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)